Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-738
District; state or public lands; right of eminent domain.

Whenever it shall be necessary, in making any improvement under the provisions of sections 31-727 to 31-762, to enter upon or cross any state or public lands, the district shall have the right to acquire a right-of-way across the same by the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

Laws 1949, c. 78, § 12, p. 199;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 80, p. 482.